Utah statutes.
58-17b-607.   Drug substitution is not the practice of medicine -- Other causes of action not denied.

(1)  The substitution of any drug by a licensed pharmacist or pharmacy intern under this chapter does not constitute the practice of medicine.

(2)  This chapter may not be construed to deny any individual a cause of action against a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or his employer for violations of this chapter, including failure to observe accepted standards of care of the pharmaceutical profession.



Enacted by Chapter 280, 2004 General Session

